District of Columbia statutes.
50-921.77

Coordination with the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority.

The Department shall coordinate DC Streetcar planning and operations with the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority to ensure efficient, cost-effective, and coordinated transit service throughout the District of Columbia.

May 21, 2002, D.C. Law 14-137, § 11s
as added Apr. 20, 2013, D.C. Law 19-268, § 3, 60 DCR 1709

History

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-268 added this section.

Effect of Amendments

Section 5 of D.C. Law 19-268 provided that this subchapter shall expire as of September 30, 2015.

Section 5 of D.C. Law 19-268, as amended by D.C. Law 21-36, §§ 6162 and 6163, provided that this subchapter shall expire as of September 30, 2016.

Editor's Notes